Montana, session 2025, HB204.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

Section 1. Section 23-5-110, MCA, is amended to read:
"23-5-110. Public policy of state concerning gambling. (1) The legislature finds that for the
purpose of ensuring the proper gambling environment in this state it is necessary and desirable to adopt a
public policy regarding public gambling activities in Montana. The legislature therefore declares it is necessary
to:
(a) create and maintain a uniform regulatory climate that assures players, owners, tourists,
citizens, and others that the gambling industry in this state is fair and is not influenced by corrupt persons,
organizations, or practices;
(b) protect legal public gambling activities from unscrupulous players and vendors and detrimental
influences;
(c) protect the public from unscrupulous proprietors and operators of gambling establishments,
games, and devices;
(d) protect the state and local governments from those who would conduct illegal gambling
activities that deprive those governments of their tax revenues;
(e) protect the health, safety, and welfare of all citizens of this state, including those who do not
gamble, by regulating gambling activities; and
(f) promote programs necessary to provide assistance to those who are adversely affected by
legalized gambling, including compulsive gamblers and their families; and
(g) provide information to citizens about gambling addiction.
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 204

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 204.1
(2) The legislature adopts the policy that an applicant for a license or permit or other department
approval under parts 1 through 8 of this chapter does not have a right to the issuance of a license or permit or
the granting of the approval sought. The issuance of a license or permit issued or other department approval
granted pursuant to the provisions of parts 1 through 8 of this chapter is a privilege revocable only for good
cause. A holder does not acquire a vested right in the license or permit issued or other department approval
granted. A license or permit issued under parts 1 through 8 of this chapter may not be sold, assigned, leased,
or transferred.
(3) Revenue to fund the expense of administration and control of gambling as regulated by parts 1
through 8 of this chapter must be derived solely from fees, taxes, and penalties on gambling activities, except
the gambling activities of the Montana state lottery and the parimutuel industry."

Section 2. Section 23-5-603, MCA, is amended to read:
"23-5-603. Video gambling machines -- possession -- play -- restriction. (1) A licensed operator
may make available for public play only the number of approved video gambling machines specifically
authorized by this part.
(2) The video gambling machines specifically authorized by this part are bingo, poker, keno, video
line, and multigame video gambling machines. Only the number of approved machines for which permits have
been granted under 23-5-612 may be made available for play by the public on the premises of a licensed
operator. The department shall adopt rules allowing a video gambling machine that needs repair to be
temporarily replaced while it is being repaired with a video gambling machine that is approved under the permit
provisions of this part. A fee may not be charged for the replacement machine.
(3) A video line game approved by the department for play must be made available to any licensed
machine owner.
(4) A manufacturer may not charge a fee for the use of a bingo, poker, keno, video line, or
multigame video gambling machine on a daily basis or any other periodic basis.
(5) A licensed operator, distributor, route operator, or manufacturer is prohibited from referencing
games not authorized under this title in advertising, promoting, or inducing play of a video gambling machine.
The department shall further define by rule what advertising is allowed under this subsection.
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 204

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 204.1
(6) Machines on premises appropriately licensed to sell alcoholic beverages for on-premises
consumption, as provided in 23-5-119, must be placed:
(a) in a room, area, or other part of the premises in which alcoholic beverages are sold or
consumed; and
(b) within control of the operator for the purpose of preventing access to the machines by persons
under 18 years of age.
(7) (a) A video gambling machine must display information about gambling addiction, including
resources provided by the department as well as phone numbers and other contact details for organizations
that provide help for gambling addiction. The information must be placed on the front of the machine in a
location that is visible while a person is using the machine and must be fully legible.
(b) A machine that is not in compliance with the requirements of subsection (7)(a) may not be used
by the public until it meets the requirements."

NEW SECTION. Section 3. Applicability. [This act] applies to video gambling machines for use by
the public on or after October 1, 2025.
- END -
- 3 - Authorized Print Version – HB 204